Utah statutes.
17B-1-410.   Notice of public hearing.
(1)  Before holding a public hearing required under Section 17B-1-409, the
board of trustees of each proposed annexing local district shall:
(a)  mail notice of the public hearing and the proposed annexation to:
(i)  if the local district is funded predominantly by revenues from a property
tax, each owner of private real property located within the area proposed to
be annexed, as shown upon the county assessment roll last equalized as of the
previous December 31; or
(ii)  if the local district is not funded predominantly by revenues from a
property tax, each registered voter residing within the area proposed to be
annexed, as determined by the voter registration list maintained by the county
clerk as of a date selected by the board of trustees that is at least 20 but
not more than 60 days before the public hearing; and
(b)  post notice of the public hearing and the proposed annexation in at least
four conspicuous places within the area proposed to be annexed, no less than
ten and no more than 30 days before the public hearing.
(2)  Each notice required under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  describe the area proposed to be annexed;
(b)  identify the proposed annexing local district;
(c)  state the date, time, and location of the public hearing;
(d)  provide a local district telephone number where additional information
about the proposed annexation may be obtained;
(e)  specify the estimated financial impact, in terms of taxes and fees, upon
the typical resident and upon the typical property owner within the area
proposed to be annexed if the proposed annexation is completed; and
(f)  except for a proposed annexation under a petition that meets the
requirements of Subsection 17B-1-413(1), explain that property owners and
registered voters within the area proposed to be annexed may protest the
annexation by filing a written protest with the local district board of
trustees within 30 days after the public hearing.
